New York, session 2025-2026, A2659.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 926 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 926. Audiological testing equipment inspection. 1. All audiological 4 testing equipment shall be inspected and tested at intervals not exceed- 5 ing one year. Inspections and tests shall be performed in accordance 6 with the applicable standards of the manufacturer and any appropriate 7 government agency. Any audiological testing equipment that does not meet 8 such applicable standards shall be exchanged for new audiological test- 9 ing equipment. 10 2. For the purposes of this section, "audiological testing equipment" 11 shall mean any equipment or device used during a hearing examination 12 pursuant to section nine hundred five of this article. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 15 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 16 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 17 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01176-01-5